apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
    <pardef n="mengajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memberhentikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memberhentikannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalat__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalati__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalatnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajar-ajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengajarinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menertawakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="ter"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menertawakannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="ter"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beragama__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpahaman__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berorientasikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkeahlian__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="ke-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpengalaman__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="peN-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berperawakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="per-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="katakan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diberhentikan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diberhentikannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="ber"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalat__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalati__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatinya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperalatnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajar__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarkan__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarkannya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajarnya__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diajar-ajari__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="debat"><p><l>berdebat</l><r>debat</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="judul"><p><l>berjudul</l><r>judul</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinar"><p><l>bersinar</l><r>sinar</r></p><par n="beragama__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>berkelakuan</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="berkeahlian__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciri"><p><l>bercirikan</l><r>ciri</r></p><par n="berorientasikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landas"><p><l>berlandaskan</l><r>landas</r></p><par n="berorientasikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teras"><p><l>berteraskan</l><r>teras</r></p><par n="berorientasikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lawan"><p><l>berlawanan</l><r>lawan</r></p><par n="berpahaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pangkal"><p><l>berpangkalan</l><r>pangkal</r></p><par n="berpahaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ukur"><p><l>berukuran</l><r>ukur</r></p><par n="berpahaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alam"><p><l>berpengalaman</l><r>alam</r></p><par n="berpengalaman__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sapu"><p><l>disapu</l><r>sapu</r></p><par n="diajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sel"><p><l>disel</l><r>sel</r></p><par n="diajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uji"><p><l>diuji</l><r>uji</r></p><par n="diajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><p><l>digunakan</l><r>guna</r></p><par n="diajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maksud"><p><l>dimaksudkan</l><r>maksud</r></p><par n="diajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="henti"><p><l>diberhentikan</l><r>henti</r></p><par n="diberhentikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>dipelajari</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="diperalati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="henti"><p><l>memberhentikan</l><r>henti</r></p><par n="memberhentikan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajar"><p><l>mempelajari</l><r>ajar</r></p><par n="memperalati__n"/></e>
    <e lm="debat"><p><l>memperdebatkan</l><r>debat</r></p><par n="memperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guna"><p><l>mempergunakan</l><r>guna</r></p><par n="memperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soal"><p><l>mempersoalkan</l><r>soal</r></p><par n="memperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tikai"><p><l>mempertikaikan</l><r>tikai</r></p><par n="memperalatkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evakuasi"><p><l>mengevakuasi</l><r>evakuasi</r></p><par n="mengajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kubur"><p><l>mengubur</l><r>kubur</r></p><par n="mengajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pesan"><p><l>memesan</l><r>pesan</r></p><par n="mengajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sewa"><p><l>menyewa</l><r>sewa</r></p><par n="mengajar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bidang"><p><l>membidangi</l><r>bidang</r></p><par n="mengajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hayat"><p><l>menghayati</l><r>hayat</r></p><par n="mengajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mahkota"><p><l>memahkotai</l><r>mahkota</r></p><par n="mengajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sesal"><p><l>menyesali</l><r>sesal</r></p><par n="mengajari__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atas"><p><l>mengatasinya</l><r>atas</r></p><par n="mengajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keliling"><p><l>mengelilinginya</l><r>keliling</r></p><par n="mengajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nama"><p><l>menamainya</l><r>nama</r></p><par n="mengajarinya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dendang"><p><l>mendendangkan</l><r>dendang</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kisah"><p><l>mengisahkan</l><r>kisah</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rahsia"><p><l>merahsiakan</l><r>rahsia</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tingkat"><p><l>meningkatkan</l><r>tingkat</r></p><par n="mengajarkan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ganti"><p><l>menggantikannya</l><r>ganti</r></p><par n="mengajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kata"><p><l>mengatakannya</l><r>kata</r></p><par n="mengajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laku"><p><l>melakukannya</l><r>laku</r></p><par n="mengajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manfaat"><p><l>memanfaatkannya</l><r>manfaat</r></p><par n="mengajarkannya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jawab"><p><l>menjawabnya</l><r>jawab</r></p><par n="mengajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lawan"><p><l>melawannya</l><r>lawan</r></p><par n="mengajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pujuk"><p><l>mempujuknya</l><r>pujuk</r></p><par n="mengajarnya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekrut"><p><l>merekrutnya</l><r>rekrut</r></p><par n="mengajarnya__n"/></e>
